New Jersey, session 222, S551.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Any person horseback riding on State-owned lands shall wear protective headgear which shall be properly fitted with the attached harness properly secured.  The headgear shall meet or exceed the headgear standards established for equestrian use by the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM), and have either a Safety Equipment Institute tag certifying conformity with the ASTM standards or a tag, label, or other indication that the headgear conforms with headgear safety standards for equestrian use comparable to those established by the ASTM. b.    A person found to have violated this section shall be subject to a fine up to $50 for a first offense and up to $200 for any subsequent offense.  All monies collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the "New Jersey Brain Injury Research Fund," established pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2003, c.200 (C.52:9EE-9), and shall be used for the purpose of making grants for brain injury research projects at qualified research institutions approved by the New Jersey State Commission on Brain Injury Research. 2.    At each entrance to State-owned lands on which members of the public may engage in equestrian activity, the Department of Environmental Protection shall erect a clear and conspicuous sign advising of the provisions of section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.